Utah statutes.
12-1-8.   Designating and limiting activities as to assignments.

Any collector having complied with the provisions of this chapter, may receive accounts, bills or other indebtedness, take assignments for the purpose of collections, and at the direction of the assignor bring suit as assignee, provided however, that all accounts shall be within the statute of limitations as provided by law.  All legal processes, pleadings, and court representations shall be prepared and conducted by a duly licensed attorney, and a copy of summons and complaint, in all cases, shall be served on defendants.



Amended by Chapter 171, 1998 General Session

